Washington statutes.
RCW 18.11.170

Unauthorized practice—Penalties.

Any auctioneer and any auction company that conducts business within this state without a license or after the suspension or revocation of his or her license shall be fined by the department five hundred dollars for the first offense and one thousand dollars for the second or subsequent offense.

[ 1986 c 324 s 13; 1982 c 205 s 15.]